Utah statutes.
78B-13-208.   Jurisdiction declined by reason of conduct.
(1)  Except as otherwise provided in Section 78B-13-204 or by other law of
this state, if a court of this state has jurisdiction under this chapter
because a person invoking the jurisdiction has engaged in unjustifiable
conduct, the court shall decline to exercise its jurisdiction unless:
(a)  the parents and all persons acting as parents have acquiesced in the
exercise of jurisdiction;
(b)  a court of the state otherwise having jurisdiction under Sections
78B-13-201 through 78B-13-203 determines that this state is a more appropriate
forum under Section 78B-13-207; or
(c)  no other state would have jurisdiction under Sections 78B-13-201 through
78B-13-203.
(2)  If a court of this state declines to exercise its jurisdiction pursuant
to Subsection (1), it may fashion an appropriate remedy to ensure the safety
of the child and prevent a repetition of the wrongful conduct, including
staying the proceeding until a child custody proceeding is commenced in a
court having jurisdiction under Sections 78B-13-201 through 78B-13-203.
(3)  If a court dismisses a petition or stays a proceeding because it declines
to exercise its jurisdiction pursuant to Subsection (1), it shall charge the
party invoking the jurisdiction of the court with necessary and reasonable
expenses including costs, communication expenses, attorney fees, investigative
fees, expenses for witnesses, travel expenses, and child care during the
course of the proceedings, unless the party from whom fees are sought
establishes that the award would be clearly inappropriate.  The court may not
assess fees, costs, or expenses against this state except as otherwise
provided by law other than this chapter.
